Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.530

Extracurricular activities—Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 28A.320.540 through 28A.320.580 and 28A.325.050 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Associated student body executive board" means the student leadership group responsible for decision making related to the associated student body at a public school.

(2) "Extracurricular activities" means school-based athletic programs. "Extracurricular activities" may also include optional noncredit school clubs.

(3) "High school student" means a public school student enrolled in any of grades nine through twelve.

(4) "Students who are low income" means students who are eligible to participate in the federal free and reduced-price meals program or, if this data is unavailable, the college bound scholarship program under chapter 28B.118 RCW.

[ 2020 c 13 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2020 c 13: See note following RCW 28A.320.580.